Tennessee, session 114, HB2555.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-19-105(b)(2)(A), is amended by
deleting "forty-five (45) days" and substituting "thirty-five (35) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to completed applications submitted to the board of physician assistants on or after that
date.
HB2555
012657
- 1 -